Maryland, session 2026, HB1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Administrator” means the State Comptroller.
17–317.

HOUSE BILL 1531 3
(a) (1) (i) All funds received under this title, including the proceeds of the
sale of abandoned property under § 17–316 of this subtitle, shall be credited by the
Administrator to a special fund.
(ii) The Administrator shall retain in the special fund at the end of
each fiscal year, from the proceeds received:
1. An amount not exceeding $5,000,000 for information
technology costs of the Administrator, including cybersecurity, customer relation systems,
and a system for managing unclaimed property; and
2. An amount of funds the Administrator reasonably
estimates is sufficient, from which sum the Administrator shall pay any claim allowed
under this title.
(2) After deducting all costs incurred in administering this title from the
remaining net funds the Administrator shall distribute $8,000,000 to the Maryland Legal
Services Corporation Fund established under § 11–402 of the Human Services Article.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Administrator
shall distribute all unclaimed money from judgments of restitution under Title 11, Subtitle
6 of the Criminal Procedure Article to the State Victims of Crime Fund established under
§ 11–916 of the Criminal Procedure Article to assist victims of crimes and delinquent acts
to protect the victims’ rights as provided by law.
(ii) If a victim entitled to restitution that has been treated as
abandoned property under § 11–614 of the Criminal Procedure Article is located after the
money has been distributed under this paragraph, the Administrator shall reduce the next
distribution to the State Victims of Crime Fund by the amount recovered by the victim.
(4) For fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, after making the
distributions required under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Administrator
shall distribute $500,000 from the remaining net funds to the Tax Clinics for Low–Income
Marylanders Fund established under § 1–207 of the Tax – General Article.
(5) For each of fiscal years 2024 through 2028, after making the
distributions required under paragraphs (2) through (4) of this subsection, the
Administrator shall distribute $14,000,000 from the remaining net funds to the Access to
Counsel in Evictions Special Fund under § 8–909 of the Real Property Article.
(6) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH
(5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL DISTRIBUTE $20,000,000
FROM THE REMAINING NET FUNDS TO THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE
AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 31–107.3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1531
[(6)] (7) After making the distributions required under paragraphs (2)
through [(5)] (6) of this subsection, the Administrator shall distribute the remaining net
funds not retained under paragraph (1) of this subsection to the General Fund of the State.
(b) (1) Before making the distribution, the Administrator shall record the
name and last known address, if any, of the owners of funds so distributed and the type of
property which the funds distributed represent.
(2) The record shall be available for public inspection during reasonable
business hours by any person who claims a legal interest in any property held by the
Administrator, provided that the person gives prior notice to the Administrator.
Article – Health – General
13–4706.
(a) There is an Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Fund.
(j) (1) [No] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, NO part of the Fund may revert or be credited to:
[(1)] (I) The General Fund of the State; or
[(2)] (II) Any other special fund of the State.
(2) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, AT THE END OF EACH FISCAL
YEAR, ANY REMAINING FUNDS IN THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND
HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 31–107.3 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
6–102.
(G) THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION IS IMPOSED IN ADDITION TO:
(1) THE SALES AND USE TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 11 OF THE TAX
– GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE PROPERTY TAXES IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 6 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
31–107.3.

HOUSE BILL 1531 5
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR” MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE EXCHANGE.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) “LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 2–312 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ENROLLEES, INDIVIDUALS WITH
HEALTH INSURANCE, AND INDIVIDUALS WITHOUT HEALTH INSURANCE FOR HEALTH
CARE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE SERVICES AND
BENEFITS UNDER STATE LAW THAT ARE SUBJECT TO FEDERAL RESTRICTIONS,
INCLUDING FUNDING RESTRICTIONS.
(3) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) PROCEEDS DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 17–317 OF
THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE;
(II) FUNDS CREDITED TO THE FUND UNDER § 13–4706 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(III) SALES AND USE TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND
UNDER § 2–1302.6 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1531
(IV) STATE PROPERTY TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE
FUND UNDER § 5–104 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(V) PRIVATE DONATIONS RECEIVED UNDER A PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE EXCHANGE;
(VI) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (7)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE FUND
MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO
PROVIDE EVIDENCE OF A NEED FOR HEALTH CARE ASSISTANCE FOR LEGALLY
PROTECTED HEALTH CARE SERVICES AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW THAT HAVE
BEEN IMPACTED BY FEDERAL RESTRICTIONS.
(7) (I) TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE EXCHANGE SHALL PROVIDE GRANTS TO HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS THAT DELIVER LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE SERVICES TO
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
(II) IF, IN THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DISCRETION, THERE IS
A SIGNIFICANT SURPLUS OF AVAILABLE ASSISTANCE, THE EXCHANGE MAY EXPAND
THE LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE SERVICES ASSISTED UNDER THE FUND TO
INCLUDE OTHER HEALTH CARE SERVICES THAT HAVE BEEN IMPACTED BY FEDERAL
RESTRICTIONS.
(III) THE EXCHANGE MAY ENTER INTO ANY CONTRACT
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS PARAGRAPH.
(8) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(9) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(10) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR HEALTH CARE
ASSISTANCE IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF

HOUSE BILL 1531 7
FUNDING THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED TO THE EXCHANGE FOR
HEALTH CARE COSTS.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027,
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE FUND.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE GROSS AMOUNT OF FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SECTION, DISAGGREGATED BY SOURCE; AND
(II) A DETAILED ACCOUNTING OF THE USE OF THE FUND.
(D) THE EXCHANGE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.6.
IN ADDITION TO THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–1301 THROUGH
2–1302.5 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE SALES
AND USE TAX REVENUE THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A PERSON SUBJECT TO TAXATION
UNDER TITLE 6 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE TO THE MARYLAND HELPING
EVERYONE AFFORD LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH)
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 31–107.3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through [2–1302.5]
2–1302.6 of this subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206
of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use tax
revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;

HOUSE BILL 1531
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
(3) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund of the
State.
Article – Tax – Property
5–104.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE STATE PROPERTY TAX REVENUE
THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A PERSON SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER TITLE 6 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE TO THE MARYLAND HELPING EVERYONE AFFORD
LIFE–SAVING TREATMENTS AND HEALTH CARE (HEALTH) FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 31–107.3 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.